Hawaii, session 2026, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 328L-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  The legislature may make appropriations from the fund for the following purposes: (1)  To maintain levels of programs determined to be essential to public health, safety, welfare, and education; (2)  To provide for counter cyclical economic and employment programs in periods of economic downturn; (3)  To restore facilities destroyed or damaged or services disrupted by disaster in any county; [and] (4)  To provide pre-determined economic payments in an amount equal to the lesser of: (A)  An amount to be set by the governor; provided that the amount shall be no less than $20,000; or (B)  The state minimum wage per hour, established pursuant to section 387-2, multiplied by 1,333 hours, to certain individuals who are Hawaii residents that have an annual gross income below $ and who have lost their homes, jobs, food, clothing, or transportation in a disaster for which the governor has declared a state of emergency; and [(4)] (5)  To meet other emergencies when declared by the governor or determined to be urgent by the legislature. Any act making appropriations from the emergency and budget reserve fund shall include a declaration of findings and purposes setting forth the purposes, the amounts, and the reasons why the appropriations are necessary and shall require a two-thirds majority vote of each house of the legislature." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________